Utah statutes.
11-49-202.   Meetings -- Staff.

(1)  The commission shall meet for the purpose of reviewing an ethics complaint when:

(a)  except otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, called to meet at the discretion of the chair; or

(b)  a majority of members agree to meet.

(2)  A majority of the commission is a quorum.

(3) (a)  The commission shall prepare, on an annual basis, a summary data report that contains:

(i)  a general description of the activities of the commission during the past year;

(ii)  the number of ethics complaints filed with the commission;

(iii)  the number of ethics complaints dismissed in accordance with Section 11-49-602;

(iv)  the number of ethics complaints reviewed by the commission in accordance with Section 11-49-701;

(v)  an executive summary of each complaint review in accordance with Section 11-49-701; and

(vi)  an accounting of the commission's budget and expenditures.

(b)  The summary data report shall be submitted to the Government Operations and Political Subdivisions Interim Committee on an annual basis.

(c)  The summary data report shall be a public record.

(4) (a)  The Senate and the House of Representatives shall employ staff for the commission at a level that is reasonable to assist the commission in performing its duties as established in this chapter.

(b)  The Legislative Management Committee shall:

(i)  authorize each staff position for the commission; and

(ii)  approve the employment of each staff member for the commission.

(c)  Staff for the commission shall work only for the commission and may not perform services for the Senate, House of Representatives, other legislative offices, or a political subdivision.

(5)  A meeting held by the commission is subject to Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, unless otherwise provided.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

